Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4

Mandatory Community-Based Services

33-7-401. Mandatory community-based services for felony defendant incompetent to stand trial but not committable.

IF AND ONLY IF

a court with criminal jurisdiction holds a hearing to commit an adult with mental illness under § 33-7-301, AND

the court finds on proof by clear and convincing evidence that the person is:

charged with a felony,

incompetent to stand trial,

not committable under § 33-6-502, AND

at risk of becoming committable, AND

the department certifies to the court that there are funds available within the limits of the department's line item appropriation for services under this section for service to the person,

THEN

the court may order the person to participate in community-based services under a plan approved and developed by the department to attain and maintain competence to stand trial and reduce the risk of becoming committable.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 7, §§ 33-7-101 — 33-7-103, 33-7-201 — 33-7-203, 33-7-301 — 33-7-303 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 22, 26, 27; 1977, ch. 386, § 1; 1979, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 224, § 17; 1982, ch. 862, § 12; 1983, ch. 323, § 23; T.C.A., §§ 33-701, 33-704, 33-708, 33-709 33-711 — 33-715; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 35-38; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 26-28; 1987, ch. 143, § 4; 1998, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

In order to effectuate the purposes of this section, funds were appropriated in Acts 2000, ch. 994. Funding was provided in Acts 2000, ch. 994.

33-7-402. Mandatory community-based services for person found in need of services by forensic examiner.

If upon completion of an evaluation of a person under § 33-7-301, the department determines that the person meets the standards in § 33-7-401(2)(B), (C), and (D), and (3), the department shall attempt to develop a community-based services plan for the person for the purpose stated. The plan shall be for a maximum of two (2) years, and no person shall participate in the plan for more than two (2) years.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-403. Hearing.

If a defendant contests a plan proposed by the department under § 33-7-401, the court shall hold a hearing within seven (7) days of receipt of the request to determine whether the plan is programmatically appropriate and legally permissible. The court shall either approve the plan or approve the plan as modified by the department to correct deficiencies found by the court.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-404. Periodic need assessment.

A service provider for a person under § 33-7-401 shall assess the person's needs at least every six (6) months and shall report to the court every six (6) months on the person's progress toward the goal of the plan, prospects for recovery, the person's current condition, the time required for relevant kinds of recovery, and whether there is substantial probability that the person will become competent to stand trial in the foreseeable future. A service provider may request the court to release the person from the plan at any time.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-405. Referral to other service provider where services under this part not effective.

If after two (2) years of intensive services for competence to stand trial under § 33-7-401, the person has not made substantial progress to attain competence to stand trial, the service provider shall assess the person's needs and may terminate the service plan and recommend to the court that the person be referred to other mental health services as deemed appropriate. The service provider shall report its conclusion to the court before terminating services.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.